Utah statutes.
75-2-608.   Exercise of power of appointment.
In the absence of a requirement that a power of appointment be exercised by a
reference, or by an express or specific reference, to the power, a general
residuary clause in a will, or a will making general disposition of all of the
testator's property, expresses an intention to exercise a power of appointment
held by the testator only if:
(1)  the power is a general power and the creating instrument does not contain
a gift if the power is not exercised; or
(2)  the testator's will manifests an intention to include the property
subject to the power.
